Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1959
Quality scale rating review; reevaluation.

(1) An applicable
child care or early childhood education program participating in the quality
rating and improvement system developed pursuant to section 71-1955 may apply
no more than once each fiscal year to have its quality scale rating reviewed.

(2) A participant
shall meet all of the quality rating criteria for a step-two rating prior
to applying for a step-three, step-four, or step-five rating. To meet quality
rating criteria for a step-three, step-four, or step-five rating, a participant
shall be independently evaluated based upon the quality rating criteria.

(3) A participant
with a quality scale rating at step two through step four shall be reevaluated
at least once every two fiscal years but no more than once in any fiscal year,
including any review pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. A participant
with a quality scale rating at step five shall be reevaluated at least once
every five years but no more than once in any fiscal year. If a participant
has achieved accreditation and is being reevaluated by a nationally recognized
accrediting body approved by the State Department of Education, the state
shall make reasonable efforts to conduct its reevaluation in the same fiscal
year that the accrediting body is reevaluating the program.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 8.